Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-556
Repealed. Laws 2018, LB377, § 87. Operative date January 1, 2019. Class I school district; annual school meeting; time; place; school year.

The annual school meeting of each Class I school district shall be held at the schoolhouse, if there is one, or at some other suitable place within the district on or before the second Monday of August of each year. The officers elected as provided in sections 79-472 and 79-565 shall take possession of the office to which they have been elected at the first meeting of the board following its election, and the school year shall commence with that day.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision II, § 1, p. 338;

Laws 1885, c. 79, § 1, p. 322;

Laws 1889, c. 78, § 2, p. 542;

R.S.1913, § 6730;

Laws 1915, c. 115, § 1, p. 265;

C.S.1922, § 6268;

C.S.1929, § 79-201;

R.S.1943, § 79-201;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 185, p. 752;

Laws 1969, c. 723, § 1, p. 2753;

Laws 1971, LB 292, § 15;

Laws 1973, LB 430, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 757, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 874, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-501;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 309;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 13;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 41;

Referendum 2006, No. 422.

Fiscal year, see section 79-1091.

The notice provisions of this section do not apply to a board of education meeting to approve general expenses such as a contract for architectural services. Banks v. Board of Education of Chase County, 202 Neb. 717, 277 N.W.2d 76 (1979).